test/src/morphology/N-bunndi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - bunndi: # -i-stammar
    bunndi+N+Sg+Nom: bunndi
    bunndi+N+Sg+Gen: bundi
    bunndi+N+Sg+Acc: bundiv
    bunndi+N+Sg+Ill: bunndij
    bunndi+N+Sg+Ine: bundin
    bunndi+N+Sg+Ela: bundist
    bunndi+N+Sg+Com: bundijn
    bunndi+N+Pl+Nom: bundi
    bunndi+N+Pl+Gen: bundij
    bunndi+N+Pl+Acc: bundijt
    bunndi+N+Pl+Ill: bundijda
    bunndi+N+Pl+Ine: bundijn
    bunndi+N+Pl+Ela: bundijst
    bunndi+N+Pl+Com: bundij
    bunndi+N+Ess: bunndin
    bunndi+N+Abe: bundidak
